Hawaii statutes.
§806-38 Instrument, how described. In
any indictment for forging, altering, offering, uttering, disposing of, or for
stealing, embezzling, extorting, converting, disposing of, destroying, or
concealing, or for obtaining by false pretenses any instrument, it shall be
sufficient to describe the instrument by any name or designation by which the
same may be usually known or by the purport thereof, without setting out any
copy or facsimile thereof or otherwise describing the same or the value
thereof. [L 1876, c 40, §29; RL 1925, §4055; RL 1935, §5512; RL 1945, §10814;
RL 1955, §258-24; HRS §711-38; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next